Utah statutes.
32B-4-204.   Arrests.

(1)  Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, an arrest of a person for a violation of this title shall be made in accordance with:

(a)  Title 77, Chapter 7, Arrest, by Whom, and How Made; and

(b)  Rules 6 and 7, Utah Rules of Criminal Procedure.

(2)  A summons in lieu of a warrant of arrest shall be in accordance with Rule 6, Utah Rules of Criminal Procedure.

